Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 2A Hospital Care for Pregnant Women

Cross references.

Newborn Baby and Mother Protection Act, §

33-24-58

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency medical services to pregnant women, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Family and Children Services, Chapter 290-2-26.

Law reviews.

For article, “State of Emergency: Why Georgia’s Standard of Care in Emergency Rooms is Harmful to Your Health,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (2010).

31-8-40.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that Georgia’s high rates of infant mortality and morbidity are costly to the state in terms of human suffering and of expenditures for long-term institutionalization, special education, and medical care. It is well documented that appropriate care during pregnancy and delivery can prevent many of the expensive, disabling problems our children experience. The State of Georgia is making progress in improving services and funding. However, the General Assembly is concerned that some women continue to be refused service for financial reasons at hospitals when they request admission after labor has begun. It is the purpose of this article to assure that:

No hospital denies available, appropriate emergency services to a woman who has not made prior arrangements for the payment of the delivery and who seeks hospital care for the safe delivery of her child;

Counties assume a share of the responsibility in meeting this critical need for their residents who receive such care when no other source of payment from public or private sources is available; and

Women receiving such care and other persons specified in this article assume certain responsibilities with regard to payment for such care after it is rendered, but it is not the purpose of this article to establish a general health insurance program for all pregnant indigent women.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1389, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 829, § 3.

Cross references.

Safe place for newborns, T. 19, C. 10A.

Law reviews.

For article, “State of Emergency: Why Georgia’s Standard of Care in Emergency Rooms is Harmful to Your Health,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (2010).

For annual survey of law on trial practice and procedure, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 339 (2010).

31-8-41.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Cost of care” means the cost of services rendered by a hospital for care required to be provided thereby under this article, and for services rendered by a physician in connection therewith, at the lesser of the actual charges or the reimbursement rate currently in effect for the hospital and physician under the medical assistance program for the needy under Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.A. Section 1396, et seq.), as amended, but shall not include any portion of such cost which is paid by the indigent patient, by the spouse or a relative of the indigent patient, by the father of the child, by insurance, or by any governmental or other public agency pursuant to any federal, state, or local program paying cost of health care for indigent patients, other than the program established by this article. The Medicaid reimbursement rate for services under this article shall not be adjusted for outlier payment. Payments actually received by a hospital or physician, when made by the patient, the patient’s spouse, family member, father of the patient’s child, or by insurance, the medical assistance program for the needy, any similar federal, state, or local program, or any other third-party payor other than a county, shall constitute payment to the hospital or physician, respectively, of the payment amount so received and exclude that amount from the definition of “cost of care.” When a hospital renders care to a woman who is not a resident of the county in which that hospital is located and that care is required to be provided under this article but there is within the county of residence of that woman a hospital which usually and customarily provides that care, “cost of care” means the lesser of the actual charges for the care actually rendered or the Medicaid reimbursement rate currently in effect for such care, which Medicaid reimbursement rate shall be that Medicaid rate for such care in the hospital of the woman’s county of residence, unless there is more than one such hospital, in which event the rate shall be the average Medicaid rate for such care in all hospitals of the woman’s county of residence.

(1.1)

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Hospital” means a hospital which is permitted to operate by the department pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 7 of this title.

“Indigency” means the inability of a patient or other person to pay the entire cost of care determined in accordance with subsection (a) of Code Section 31-8-43.

“Patient” means a pregnant woman who receives services under this article.

“Resident of the county” means a person who is domiciled in the county as determined pursuant to Chapter 2 of Title 19.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1389, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 829, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-10/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-8-42.
Requirement of hospitals with emergency services to provide care to pregnant women in labor.

Any hospital which operates an emergency service shall be required to provide the appropriate, necessary emergency services to any pregnant woman who is a resident of this state and who presents herself in active labor to the hospital, if those services are usually and customarily provided in that facility, which services shall be provided within the scope of generally accepted practice based upon the information furnished the hospital by the pregnant woman, including such information as the pregnant woman reveals concerning her prenatal care, diet, allergies, previous births, general health information, and other such information as the pregnant woman may furnish the hospital. If, in the medical judgment of the physician responsible for the emergency service, the hospital must transfer the patient because the hospital is unable to provide appropriate treatment, the hospital where the patient has presented herself shall:

Within the capabilities of the hospital provide such emergency services as the circumstances require, which services shall be provided within the scope of generally accepted practice based upon the information furnished the hospital by the pregnant woman, including such information as the pregnant woman reveals concerning her prenatal care, diet, allergies, previous births, general health information, and other such information as the pregnant woman may furnish the hospital;

Contact an appropriate receiving hospital and notify such hospital that the patient is in transit;

Arrange suitable transportation for the patient if necessary; and

Send to the receiving hospital any available information on the patient’s history and condition.

The transfer shall not be authorized until the physician considers the patient sufficiently stabilized for transport.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1389, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 829, § 3.

31-8-43.
Determination of indigency; payment of services provided under Code Section 31-8-42 for indigent patients by county; records; administration.

The commissioner of community health shall adopt state-wide standards to determine indigency for the purposes of this article, which standards shall be based upon and consistent with 125 percent of the federal poverty level as it exists on May 1, 1985. These standards shall further provide for legal liability, based upon ability to pay some reasonable percentage of cost of care, for patients and other persons legally liable for the patients’ cost of care if those patients or other persons do not meet the indigency standards based upon less than 100 percent of the federal poverty level but do meet those standards based upon between 100 and 125 percent of the federal poverty level, as such level exists on May 1, 1985.

Within 30 days after receiving the standards provided by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the governing authority of each county, by resolution, shall designate a person, to be known as the health care advisory officer of the county, to make a determination of indigency for the residents of the county in accordance with the standards promulgated pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section. The health care advisory officer shall carry out such additional duties as may be assigned to him by the governing authority of the county. It shall be the duty of the governing authority of each county to mail a copy of such resolution to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee within 15 days after its adoption. The governing authority of any county may change the person designated as the health care advisory officer, but any such change shall be accomplished by resolution of the governing authority, and a copy of the resolution making such change shall be mailed to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee within 15 days after its adoption. If a county fails or refuses either to designate a health care advisory officer or to provide to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee the required notification of the county’s designation of such officer, the county governing authority shall be deemed to be such officer for purposes of this article.

When a patient receives health care from a hospital or physician, which care that hospital is required to provide the patient under Code Section 31-8-42, and when such patient claims indigency, the chief administrative officer of the hospital shall determine whether any portion of the cost of services may be paid by the medical assistance program for the needy under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, by insurance, or by any other governmental or public agency pursuant to any federal, state, or local program and provide written notification of such determination to the health care advisory officer of the county of residence of the patient. Such notification shall include a certification by the chief administrative officer of the hospital that an appropriate investigation has been made and that it has been determined that no portion of the cost of services may be paid by the medical assistance program for the needy under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, by insurance, or by any other governmental or public agency pursuant to any federal, state, or local program or a certification that an appropriate investigation has been made and that a portion of the cost of services may be paid from such sources. If it is determined that a portion of the cost of services may be paid from such sources, then the notification shall include a certification of the amount which may be so paid. Such notification shall also request a determination of indigency of the patient. As soon as practicable after receiving such notification but not later than 60 days thereafter, the health care advisory officer of the county shall notify the chief administrative officer of the hospital of his determination. If the health care advisory officer determines that the patient meets the indigency standards or if the health care advisory officer of a county fails to respond to a request for a determination of indigency from a hospital providing health care for such patient within the time limitation provided by this subsection, the county of residence of the patient shall be liable for the payment of cost of care of such patient in each hospital rendering the emergency services. In such event, each hospital and physician providing the emergency health care for the patient may bill the county of residence of the patient for the amount of the patient’s cost of care. It shall be the duty of the governing authority of such county to pay the hospital and physician that billed amount plus, if that billed amount is not paid by the county within 120 days after the mailing of a request for a determination of indigency, interest on the billed amount at the rate specified in Code Section 48-2-40 for unpaid taxes.

To the end that the certifications of indigency required by subsection (c) of this Code section may be expedited, it shall be the duty of each county health care advisory officer to establish and maintain files showing the names of county residents whom that officer has determined to be indigent.

It shall be the duty of the commissioner to devise such standard forms as may be necessary or desirable to administer this Code section uniformly. It shall be the duty of counties, health care advisory officers, and hospitals to use the forms promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this subsection.

To the extent practicable and consistent with appropriate health care, the commissioner and the health care advisory officer shall encourage the use of hospitals located in the county of residence of the pregnant woman.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1389, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 829, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228.

31-8-43.1.
Extent of patient’s liability for costs; required cooperation of patient with county; liability of father for costs; action by county to recover costs or challenge determination of liability.

A patient who receives services under this article shall, by accepting such services, be deemed to have agreed to:

Be liable to any county which pays all or any part of that patient’s cost of care for the entire amount so paid by that county, except that a patient who meets the indigency standards based upon 100 to 125 percent of the federal poverty level shall be liable for an amount which is the greater of $100.00 or the reasonable percentage of costs for which the patient is liable under subsection (a) of Code Section 31-8-43 and a patient who meets the indigency standards based upon less than 100 percent of the federal poverty level shall be liable for $100.00 of those costs, but liability under this subsection shall never exceed the county’s payments for cost of care;

Have made an assignment to that county paying any part of that patient’s cost of care for any benefits for such care for which the patient is eligible from a third party up to the amount actually paid and cooperate with the county in obtaining any such benefits to repay the county;

Cooperate with any county paying any part of that patient’s cost of care in identifying the father of a child delivered to the patient by a hospital acting in compliance with this article and in seeking to obtain from such father repayment of that portion of the county’s payment which, under the indigency standards, that father is able to repay; and

Cooperate with any county paying any part of that patient’s cost of care in applying and qualifying for the medical assistance program for the needy under Title XIX of the Social Security Act or any other federal, state, or local governmental program for which the patient may be eligible.

The failure of a patient to cooperate as required by paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall render the patient and any person liable for other expenses of the patient, including but not limited to the parents of a minor patient and the spouse of a patient, liable to the county for all payments which that county makes for the patient’s cost of care. Failure of a patient to cooperate as required by paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be a valid ground to deny the patient services otherwise required to be provided under this article unless the patient at the time of admission refuses to sign a document, in such form as the commissioner shall prescribe and provide, acknowledging notification that the patient’s receiving services shall constitute an agreement to the terms of paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section unless waived by the county health care advisory officer.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the father of a patient’s child who is delivered by a hospital as required by this article and any other person legally responsible for other expenses of the patient shall be liable to the county which pays the patient’s cost of care to the same extent the patient is liable therefor under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section. This obligation to make repayment shall be in addition to any other obligation imposed by law.

The county may bring a civil action to recover, from any person liable therefor under this Code section, those payments which the county has made for a patient’s cost of care to the extent of the liability imposed by this Code section but in no event may recover more than the county paid for such costs of care.

A county or any person aggrieved by any determination under this article that such county or person is liable for a patient’s cost of care may bring a de novo civil action in superior court challenging that determination.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-43.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 829, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31.

31-8-44.
Immunity of hospital or health care provider from liability.

No physician, nurse, or other such medical assistant, nor the hospital or any of its agents or employees shall be guilty of malpractice or civilly liable therefor for treatment rendered under this article unless the physician, nurse, or other medical assistant, or the hospital, its agent, or employee has been grossly negligent in the provision of such services or has willfully failed to comply with the provisions of this article. No action shall be brought in connection with treatment rendered under this article without a specific allegation of gross negligence or willful failure to comply.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1389, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 829, § 3.

Cross references.

Actions for medical malpractice generally, §

51-1-27

.

31-8-45.
Availability of cause of action for patient wrongfully denied care.

If a hospital fails or refuses to provide treatment or services pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 31-8-42, a person aggrieved by such failure or refusal shall have a cause of action against the hospital for damages and for such other relief as the court having jurisdiction of the action deems proper. No person shall be prohibited from maintaining such an action for failure to exhaust any rights to administrative relief.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1389, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 829, § 3.

31-8-46.
Investigation; penalties; rules and regulations.

If the department receives notice that a violation by a hospital of Code Section 31-8-42 is in progress, the department shall immediately order an investigation to determine whether or not there has been a violation and upon finding that a violation has occurred shall immediately order the hospital to comply with that Code section.

If a hospital violates Code Section 31-8-42, the department shall assess a civil penalty of $500.00 for each such violation. Any such civil penalty shall be imposed by the department only after notice and hearing as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title. Any person or facility subject to a civil penalty under this Code section is entitled to judicial review in accordance with Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title. All civil penalties recovered by the department under this Code section shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury.

Any hospital held to be in violation of Code Section 31-8-42 more than three times within any 12 month period shall be subject to suspension or revocation of license by the Department of Community Health.

The Department of Community Health is authorized and directed to promulgate appropriate rules and regulations for the enforcement of this article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to preempt any other law or to deny to any individual any rights or remedies which are provided by or under any other law.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1389, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 829, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-27/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.